Nevada, session 83, SB88-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Natural Resources shall conduct a study during the 2023-2024
interim concerning state agencies that regulate natural resources.
2. The study must include, without limitation, the examination
of the composition, mission and scope of state agencies that regulate
natural resources in this State.
3. The Committee shall examine, without limitation:
(a) The Board of Wildlife Commissioners;
(b) The Commission on Mineral Resources;
(c) The State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources; and
(d) The State Environmental Commission.
4. The Committee shall include its findings and
recommendations for legislation relating to this study in the report
required by subsection 4 of NRS 218E.330 to be prepared and
submitted to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 83rd Session of the Legislature.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*SB88*